sv: Lämplig för vapentyp: Pistol; Gevär; Shotgun; Övrigt
sl-SI: Primerno za vrsto orožja: Pištola; Puška; Šibrenica; Drugo
fi: Sopii asetyypille: Pistooli; Kivääri; Haulikko; Muu
sk-SK: Vhodné pre typ zbrane: Pištoľ; Puška; Brokovnica; Iné
en: Suitable for weapon type: Pistol; Rifle; Shotgun; Other
ro-RO: Potrivit pentru tipul de armă: Pistol; Pușcă; Pușcă de vânătoare; Altele
el: Κατάλληλο για τύπο όπλου: Πιστόλι; Τουφέκι; Όπλο; Άλλο
fr: Convient au type d’arme: Pistolet; Fusil; Fusil à pompe; Autre
pl: Odpowiedni dla typu broni: Pistolet; Karabin; Strzelba; Inne
th: ประเภทเหมาะสำหรับอาวุธ: ด้ามปืน; ไรเฟิล; การรับเสียงแบบช็อตกัน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Adequado para tipo de arma: Pistola; Rifle; Espingarda; Outro
es: Adecuado para tipo de arma: Pistola; Rifle; Escopeta; Otros
vi: Phù hợp với loại vũ khí: Kiểu báng súng; Đường rãnh xoắn; Shotgun; Khác
lt-LT: Tinka ginklo tipui: Pistoletas; Šautuvas; Medžioklinis šautuvas; Kita
tr: Silah türüne uygun: Tabanca; Tüfek; Pompalı tüfek; Diğer
pt-PT: Adequado para tipo de arma: Pistola; Espingarda; Shotgun; Outro
hr-HR: Prikladno za vrstu oružja: Pištolj; Puška; Sačmarica; Ostalo
de: Eignung für Waffentyp: Pistole; Gewehr; Richtrohr; Sonstiges
da: Velegnet til våbentype: Pistol; Riffel; Shotgun; Andet
nl: Geschikt voor wapentype: Pistool; Geweer; Jachtgeweer; Andere
zh-CN: 适用武器类型: 枪式; 步枪; 短枪; 其他
ja: 利用に適した武器の種類: ピストル; ライフル; ショットガン; その他
nb: Egnet for våpentype: Pistol; Rifle; Hagle; Annet
bg-BG: Подходящ за тип оръжие: Пистолет; Карабина; Пушка; Други
zh-TW: 適用武器類型: 手槍式; 步槍; 霰彈槍; 其他
ko: 무기 종류에 적합: 피스톨; 라이플; 샷건; 기타
hu: Fegyvertípus: Pisztoly; Puska; Vadászpuska; Egyéb
cs: Vhodné pro typ zbraně: Pistole; Puška; Shotgun; Jiné
ru: Для какого типа оружия: Пистолет; Винтовка; Дробовик; Другое
it: Tipo di arma ideale: A pistola; Fucile; Mezzo fucile; Altro